Connecticut, session 2026, SB00121.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subsection (c) section 14-50 of the general statutes be amended
to exempt any active duty service member who was not a resident of
Connecticut at the time of induction from paying fees for any motor
vehicle operator's license or registration.